en: sodium selenate
ar: سيلينات الصوديوم
bg: Натриев селенат
cs: selenan sodný
de: Natriumselenat
el: σεληνικό νάτριο
eo: natria selenato
es: seleniato de sodio
et: naatriumselenaat
fa: سلنات سدیم
fi: natriumselenaatti
fr: sélénate de sodium
hu: nátrium-szelenát
hy: Նատրիումի սելենատ
id: Natrium selenat
it: selenato di sodio, seleniato di sodio
lt: natrio selenatas
lv: nātrija selenāts
mt: selenat tas-sodju
nl: natriumselenaat
pl: selenian sodu
pt: selenato de sódio
ro: selenat de sodiu
sh: Natrijum selenat
sk: selénan sodný
sl: natrijev selenat
sr: Natrijum selenat
sv: natriumselenat
vi: Natri selenat
zh: 硒酸鹽

en: sodium hydrogen selenite
bg: Натриев хидроген селенит
cs: hydrogenseleničitan sodný
de: Natriumhydrogenselenit
el: όξινο σεληνιώδες νάτριο
es: selenito ácido de sodio
et: naatriumvesinikseleniit
fi: natriumvetyseleniitti
fr: hydrogénosélénite de sodium
hu: nátrium-hidrogén-szelenit
it: selenito acido di sodio
lt: natrio vandenilio selenitas
lv: nātrija hidrogēnselenīts
mt: idroġenu selenit tas-sodju
nl: natriumwaterstofseleniet
pl: wodoroselenian(IV) sodu
pt: hidrogenosselenito de sódio
ro: selenit hidrogenat de sodiu
sk: hydroseleničitan sodný
sl: natrijev hidrogen selenit
sv: natriumväteselenit

en: Sodium selenite
xx: 3b801, 3b802
ar: سيلينيت الصوديوم
bg: Натриев селенит
cs: seleničitan sodný
da: natriumselenit
de: Natriumselenit
el: σεληνιώδες νάτριο
eo: Natria selenito
es: selenito de sodio
et: naatriumseleniit
fa: سلنیت سدیم
fi: natriumseleniitti
fr: sélénite de sodium
hr: natrijev selenit
hu: nátrium-szelenit
it: selenito di sodio
ja: 亜セレン酸ナトリウム
lt: natrio selenitas
lv: nātrija selenīts
mt: selenit tas-sodju
nl: natriumseleniet
pl: selenin sodu
pt: selenito de sódio
ro: selenit de sodiu
ru: селенит натрия
sh: Natrijum selenit
sk: seleničitan sodný
sl: natrijev selenit
sr: Natrijum selenit
sv: natriumselenit
ta: சோடியம் செலீனைட்டு
vi: Natri selenit
zh: 亞硒酸鹽

en: selenium enriched yeast
bg: Обогатени със селен дрожди
cs: kvasnice obohacené selenem
de: Selenangereicherte Hefe
el: εμπλουτισμένοι με σελήνιο ζυμομήκυτες
es: levadura enriquecida con selenio
et: seleeniga rikastatud pärm
fi: seleenillä rikastettu hiiva
fr: levure enrichie en sélénium
hu: szelénnel dúsított élesztő
it: lievito arricchito in selenio
lt: selenu papildytos mielės
lv: ar selēnu bagātināts raugs
mt: mira arrikkita bis-selenju
nl: met seleen verrijkte gist
pl: drożdże wzbogacone w selen
pt: levedura enriquecida em selénio
ro: drojdie îmbogățită cu seleniu
sk: kvasnice obohatené selénom
sl: s selenom obogatene kvasovke
sv: selenberikad jäst

en: Chromium
af: chroom
am: ክሮሚየም
an: Cromo
ar: كروم
az: Xrom
be: Хром
bg: Хром
bn: ক্রোমিয়াম
bo: ཀོ་ལྕགས།
br: Krom
bs: hrom
ca: crom
co: Cromu
cs: Chrom
cv: Хром
cy: Cromiwm
da: krom
de: Chrom
dv: ކްރޯމިއަމް
el: Χρώμιο
eo: kromo
es: Cromo
et: Kroom
eu: kromo
fa: کروم
fi: Kromi
fo: Krom
fr: Chrome
ga: Cróimiam
gl: cromo
gu: ક્રોમિયમ
gv: Cromium
he: כרום
hi: क्रोमियम
hr: krom
ht: Kwòm
hu: Króm
hy: քրոմ
ia: chromo
id: Kromium
io: kromo
is: króm
it: Cromo
ja: クロム
jv: Kromiyum
ka: ქრომი
kk: Хром
kn: ಕ್ರೋಮಿಯಮ್
ko: 크로뮴
ku: Krom
kv: Хром
ky: Хром
la: chromium
lb: Chrom
li: Chroeam
lt: Chromas
lv: Hroms
mi: konukita
mk: хром
ml: ക്രോമിയം
mn: Хром
mr: क्रोमियम
ms: Kromium
mt: Kromju
my: ခရိုမီယမ်
nb: krom
ne: क्रोमियम
nl: Chroom
oc: Cròme
or: କ୍ରୋମିୟମ
pa: ਕ੍ਰੋਮੀਅਮ
pi: क्रोमियम
pl: Chrom
pt: Crómio
qu: Krumu
ro: Crom
ru: хром
sa: क्रोमियम
sc: Cromu
sh: Hrom
sk: Chróm
sl: Krom
so: Koroomiyaam
sq: Kromi
sr: хром
su: Kromium
sv: Krom
sw: Chromi
ta: குரோமியம்
te: క్రోమియం
tg: Хром
th: โครเมียม
tl: Kromyo
tr: krom
tt: Хром
ug: خروم
uk: хром
ur: کرومیئم
uz: Xrom
vi: crom
yi: כראם
yo: Krómíọ̀mù
zh: 铬

en: chromium chloride
de: Chrom-chlorid
fi: Kromikloridi
fr: chlorure de chrome
it: cloruro di cromo
pt: cloreto de crômio
ro: Clorură de crom

en: chromic chloride
ar: كلوريد الكروم الثلاثي
cs: Chlorid chromitý
de: Chrom-III-chlorid, Chrom(III)-chlorid
el: Τριχλωριούχο χρώμιο
fa: کلرید کروم(III)
fi: Kromi(III)kloridi
fr: chlorure de chrome (III)
it: cloruro di cromo (III), Tricloruro di cromo
nl: Chroom(III)chloride
pl: chlorek chromu(III)
ru: хлорид хрома(III)
sk: Chlorid chromitý
sv: Krom(III)klorid

en: chromium (III) sulfate and its hexahydrate
bg: Хром (III) сулфат и неговите хексахидрати
cs: síran chromitý a jeho hexahydrát
de: Chrom-(III)-Sulfat und sein Hexahydrat
el: θειικό χρώμιο (III) και το εξαϋδρικό άλας του
es: sulfato de cromo (III) y su hexahidrato
et: kroom(III)sulfiid ja selle heksahüdraat
fi: kromi-(III)-sulfaatti ja sen heksahydraatti
fr: Sulfate de chrome (III) et ses formes hexahydratées
hu: króm(III)-szulfát és hexahidrátjai
it: solfato di cromo (III) e il suo esaidrato
lt: chromo (III) sulfatas ir jo heksahidratas
lv: hroma (III) sulfāts un tā heksahidrāts
mt: sulfat tal-kromju (III) u l-eżaidrat tiegħu
nl: chroom (III) sulfaat en het hexahydraat daarvan
pl: siarczan chromu(III) i jego heksahydrat
pt: sulfato de crómio (III) e a sua forma hexa-hidratada
ro: sulfat de crom (III) și hexahidratul său
sk: síran chromitý (III) a jeho hexahydrát
sl: kromov (III) sulfat in njegov heksahidrat
sv: krom(III)sulfat och dess hexahydrat

en: chromium picolinate
bg: Хромен пиколинат
cs: pikolinát chromitý
de: Chrompicolinat
el: πικολινικό χρώμιο
es: picolinato de cromo
et: kroompikolinaat
fi: kromipikolinaatti
fr: picolinate de chrome
hu: króm(III)-pikolinát
it: picolinato di cromo
lt: chromo pikolinatas
lv: hroma pikolināts
mt: pikolinat tal-kromju
nl: chroompicolinaat
pl: pikolinian chromu
pt: picolinato de crómio
ro: picolinat de crom
sk: pikolinát chromitý
sl: kromov pikolinat
sv: krompikolinat

en: chromium nicotinate, chromium(III) nicotinate, chromium trinicotinate, chromium polynicotinate
es: polinicotinato de cromo

en: molybdenum
af: molibdeen
am: ሞሊብዴነም
an: Molibdén
ar: موليبدنوم
az: Molibden
be: Малібдэн
bg: Молибден
bn: মলিবডিনাম
bo: མོ་ལིབ་ཌེ་ནིམ།
br: Molibden
bs: molibden
ca: molibdè
co: Molibdenu
cs: molybden
cv: Молибден
cy: Molybdenwm
da: molybdæn
de: Molybdän
dv: މޮލިބްޑިނަމް
el: μολυβδαίνιο
eo: molibdeno
es: molibdeno
et: Molübdeen
eu: molibdeno
fa: مولیبدن
fi: molybdeeni
fr: molybdène
ga: Molaibdéineam
gd: Moilibdeanum
gl: Molibdeno
gu: મોલિબ્ડેનમ
gv: Molybdenum
he: מוליבדן
hi: मोलिब्डेनम
hr: Molibden
hu: molibdén
hy: մոլիբդեն
ia: molybdeno
id: Molibdenum
io: molibdo
is: mólýbden
it: molibdeno
ja: モリブデン
jv: Molibden
ka: მოლიბდენი
kk: Молибден
kn: ಮಾಲಿಬ್ಡಿನಮ್
ko: 몰리브데넘
ku: Molîbden
kv: Молибден
ky: Молибден
la: molybdenum
lb: Molybdän
li: Molybdeen
lt: Molibdenas
lv: molibdēns
mk: Молибден
ml: മൊളിബ്ഡിനം
mn: Молибден
mr: मॉलिब्डेनम
ms: Molibdenum
mt: molibdenu
nb: molybden
ne: मोलिब्डेनम
nl: molybdeen
nn: molybden
oc: Molibdèn
or: ମଲିବ୍‌ଡ଼େନମ
pa: ਮੋਲਿਬਡੇਨਮ
pi: मोलिब्डेनम
pl: molibden
pt: molibdénio
qu: Molibdenu
ro: molibden
ru: молибден
sa: मोलिब्डेनम
sh: Molibden
sk: Molybdén
sl: Molibden
so: Molybdenum
sq: Molibdeni
sr: молибден
su: Molibdénum
sv: molybden
sw: Molibdeni
ta: மாலிப்டினம்
tg: Молибден
th: โมลิบดีนัม
tl: Molibdeno
tr: Molibden
tt: Молибден
ug: مولبېدىن
uk: молібден
ur: مولیبڈینم
uz: Molibden
vi: molypden
yo: Molybdenum
zh: 钼

en: ammonium molybdate
bg: Амониев молибдат
cs: molybdenan amonný
de: Ammoniummolybdat
el: μολυβδαινικό αμμώνιο
es: molibdato de amonio
et: ammooniummolübdaat
fi: ammoniummolybdaatti
fr: molybdate d’ammoniaque
hu: ammónium-molibdát
it: molibdato di ammonio
lt: amonio molibdatas
lv: amonija molibdāts
mt: molibdata tal-ammonju
nl: ammoniummolybdaat
pl: molibdenian(VI) amonu
pt: molibdato de amónio
ro: molibdat de amoniu
sk: molybdénan amónny
sl: amonijev molibdat
sv: ammoniummolybdat

en: sodium molybdate
ar: موليبدات الصوديوم
cs: Molybdenan sodný
de: Natriummolybdat
eo: Natria molibdenato
es: Molibdato de sodio
fa: سدیم مولیبدات
fi: Natriummolybdaatti
fr: molybdate de sodium
it: molibdeno di sodio
ja: モリブデン酸ナトリウム
nl: Natriummolybdaat
pl: Molibdenian sodu
pt: molibdato de sódio
ru: молибдат натрия
sh: Natrijum molibdat
sr: Natrijum molibdat
ta: சோடியம் மாலிப்டேட்டு
vi: Natri molipđat
zh: 钼酸钠

en: iodine
af: jodium
am: አዮዲን
an: Yodo
ar: يود
az: Yod
ba: Иод
be: Ёд
bg: Йод
bi: Aiodin
bn: আয়োডিন
bo: ལྦ་ཚྭ།
br: Iod
bs: jod
ca: iode
co: Iodiu
cs: Jod
cv: Иод
cy: Ïodin
da: jod
de: Jod, Iodid
dv: އަޔޮޑިން
el: Ιώδιο
eo: jodo
es: Yodo
et: Jood
eu: iodo
fa: ید
fi: Jodi
fo: Jod
fr: Iode
ga: Iaidín
gd: Aidhodain
gl: Iodo
gu: આયોડિન
gv: Eeadeen
he: יוד
hi: आयोडिन
hr: Jod
ht: Yòd
hu: Jód
hy: յոդ
ia: iodo
id: Iodin
io: iodo
is: joð
it: Iodio
ja: ヨウ素
jv: Yodium
ka: იოდი
kk: Йод
kn: ಅಯೊಡಿನ್
ko: 아이오딘
kv: Йод
ky: Иод
la: Iodum
lb: Iod
li: Jodium
lt: Jodas
lv: Jods
mk: јод
ml: അയോഡിൻ
mn: Иод
mr: आयोडिन
ms: Iodin
mt: Jodju
my: အိုင်အိုဒင်း
nb: jod
ne: आयोडिन
nl: jodium
nn: jod
oc: Iòde
or: ଆୟୋଡ଼ିନ
os: Йод
pa: ਆਇਓਡੀਨ
pi: आयोडिन
pl: Jod
pt: Iodo
qu: Yudu
ro: Iod
ru: иод
sa: अयोडिन्
sh: Jod
sk: Jód
sl: Jod
so: Aaydhiin
sq: Jodi
sr: јод
su: Yodium
sv: Jod
sw: Iodini
ta: அயோடின்
te: అయోడిన్
tg: Йод
th: ไอโอดีน
tl: Yodo
tr: İyot
tt: иод
uk: Йод
ur: آیوڈین
uz: Yod
vi: iốt
yi: יאד
yo: Iodine
zh: 碘

en: potassium iodide
xx: 3b201
ar: يوديد البوتاسيوم
bg: Калиев йодид
bs: Kalij jodid
ca: iodur de potassi
cs: Jodid draselný
da: Kaliumiodid
de: Kaliumiodid, Kaliumjodid
el: ιωδιούχο κάλιο
eo: kalia jodido
es: yoduro de potasio
fa: پتاسیم یدید
fi: Kaliumjodidi
fr: iodure de potassium
hi: पोटासियम आयोडाइड
hr: kalijev jodid
hu: kálium-jodid
id: Kalium iodida
it: ioduro di potassio
ja: ヨウ化カリウム
ko: 아이오딘화 칼륨
ky: Калий иодиди
lv: kālija jodīds
nb: Kaliumjodid
nl: kaliumjodide
nn: Kaliumjodid
or: ପୋଟାସିଅମ ଆୟୋଡାଇଡ
pl: Jodek potasu
pt: iodeto de potássio
ro: Iodură de potasiu
ru: иодид калия
sh: Kalijum jodid
sk: Jodid draselný
sl: Kalijev jodid
sr: калијум-јодид
sv: Kaliumjodid
te: పొటాషియం అయోడైడు
th: โพแทสเซียมไอโอไดด์
tr: Potasyum iyodür
uk: Йодид калію
vi: Kali iođua
zh: 碘化钾

en: potassium iodate
ar: يودات البوتاسيوم
bg: Калиев йодат
ca: iodat de potassi
cs: jodičnan draselný, Jodečnan draselný
de: Kaliumiodat, Kaliumjodat
el: ιωδικό κάλιο
eo: kalia jodato
es: yodato de potasio, Yodato potásico
et: kaaliumjodaat
fa: پتاسیم یدات
fi: Kaliumjodaatti, Kaliumjodaattia
fr: Iodate de potassium
hu: Kálium-jodát
id: Kalium iodat
it: Iodato di potassio
ja: ヨウ素酸カリウム
lt: kalio jodatas
lv: kālija jodāts
mt: jodat tal-potassju
nl: Kaliumjodaat
pl: Jodan potasu, Jodan-V potasu
pt: Iodato de potássio
ro: Iodat de potasiu
ru: иодат калия
sh: Kalijum jodat
sk: jodičnan draselný
sl: kalijev jodat
sr: Kalijum jodat
sv: kaliumjodat
ta: பொட்டாசியம் அயோடேட்டு|
tr: Potasyum iyodat
uk: Йодат калію
vi: Kali iodat
zh: 碘酸钾

en: sodium iodate
bg: Натриев йодат
cs: jodičnan sodný
de: Natriumiodat
el: ιωδικό νάτριο
es: yodato de sodio
et: naatriumjodaat
fi: natriumjodaatti
fr: iodate de sodium
hu: nátrium-jodát
it: iodato di sodio
lt: natrio jodatas
lv: nātrija jodāts
mt: jodat tas-sodju
nl: natriumjodaat
pl: jodan sodu
pt: iodato de sódio
ro: iodat de sodiu
sk: jodičnan sodný
sl: natrijev jodat
sv: natriumjodat

en: calcium iodate
ar: يودات الكالسيوم
ca: iodat de calci
da: calciumiodat
de: Calciumiodat
el: ιωδικό ασβέστιο
es: yodato de calcio
fi: Kalsiumjodaatti
fr: iodate de calcium, iodate de calcium anhydre
hu: Kalcium-jodát
it: Iodato di calcio
ja: ヨウ素酸カルシウム
nl: calciumjodaat
pl: Jodan wapnia
pt: iodato de cálcio
ru: Иодат кальция
sh: Kalcijum jodatsr:Kalcijum jodat
ta: கால்சியம் அயோடேட்டு
tr: Kalsiyum iyodat
vi: Canxi iodat
zh: 碘酸鈣

en: Sodium
af: natrium
am: ሶዲየም
an: Sodio
ar: صوديوم
az: Natrium
be: натрый
bg: Натрий
bn: সোডিয়াম
bo: བུལ་རྫས།
br: Sodiom
bs: natrij
ca: sodi
co: Sodiu
cs: Sodík
cv: Натри
cy: Sodiwm
da: natrium
de: Natrium
dv: ސޯޑިއަމް
el: Νάτριο
eo: natrio
es: Sodio
et: Naatrium
eu: sodio
fa: سدیم
fi: Natrium
fo: Natrium
fr: sodium
fy: Natrium
ga: Sóidiam
gd: Sòidium
gl: Sodio
gu: સોડિયમ
gv: Sodjum
he: נתרן
hi: सोडियम
hr: natrij, natrijev, natrijevi
ht: Sodyòm
hu: Nátrium
hy: նատրիում
ia: sodium
id: Natrium
io: natro
is: natrín
it: Sodio
ja: ナトリウム
jv: Natrium
ka: ნატრიუმი
ki: Sodium
kk: Натрий
km: សូដ្យូម
kn: ಸೋಡಿಯಮ್
ko: 나트륨
ku: Natriyûm
kv: Натрий
ky: Натрий
la: natrium
lb: Natrium
li: Natrium
ln: Sodu
lt: Natris
lv: Nātrijs
mi: konutai
mk: натриум
ml: സോഡിയം
mn: Натри
mr: सोडियम
ms: Natrium
mt: Sodju
my: ဆိုဒီယမ်
nb: natrium
ne: सोडियम
nl: Natrium
nn: natrium
nv: Soodin
oc: Sòdi
or: ସୋଡ଼ିଅମ
pa: ਸੋਡੀਅਮ
pi: सोडियम
pl: Sód
pt: Sódio
qu: Natriyu
ro: Sodiu
ru: натрий
sa: सोडियम
sh: Natrij
si: සෝඩියම්
sk: Sodík
sl: Natrij
so: Saadiyom
sq: Natriumi
sr: натријум
su: Natrium
sv: Natrium
sw: Natiri
ta: சோடியம்
te: సోడియమ్
tg: Натрий
th: โซเดียม
tl: Sodyo
tr: Sodyum
tt: Натрий
ug: ناترىي
uk: натрій
ur: صوداصر
uz: Natriy
vi: natri
wa: Sodiom
yi: נאטריום
yo: Sodiomu
zh: 钠

en: sodium bicarbonate
bg: Натриев бикарбонат
ca: bicarbonat sòdic
cs: hydrogenuhličitan sodný
de: Natriumbicarbonat
el: διττανθρακικό νάτριο
es: bicarbonato de sodio, bicarbonatos de sodico
et: naatriumvesinikkarbonaat
fi: natriumbikarbonaatti
fr: bicarbonate de sodium
hr: soda bikarbona
hu: nátrium-bikarbonát
it: bicarbonato di sodio
ja: 炭酸水素ナトリウム, 重炭酸ナトリウム, 重炭酸ソーダ
lt: natrio bikarbonatas
lv: nātrija bikarbonāts
mt: bikarbonat tas-sodju
nl: natriumwaterstofcarbonaat/natriumbicarbonaat
pl: diwęglan sodu
pt: bicarbonato de sódio
ro: bicarbonat de sodiu
sk: hydrouhličitan sodný
sl: natrijev bikarbonat
sv: natriumbikarbonat, bikarbonat